dictsource/egy_rules
// Ancient Egyptian spelling-to-phoneme rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// Ancient Egyptian has only two letters: p and t, both pronounced like Latin

// Letter groups
.L01 a e i o u
.L02 p t r ꜥ

// Vowels - using basic vowels
.group a
             a            a
             aa           a:

.group e
             e            e
             ee           e:

.group i
             i            i
             ii           i:

.group o
             o            o
             oo           o:

.group u
             u            u
             uu           u:

// Consonants - p, t, r, and ayin (ꜥ)
.group p
             p            p
             pp           p:

.group t
             t            t
             tt           t:

.group r
             r            r
             rr           r:

.group ꜥ
             ꜥ            A
             ꜥꜥ           A:

// Default rule for any other characters
// This will handle any other characters that might be input
.group *
             *            * 
